Maryland, session 2025, SB0892.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
Subtitle 3. Salaries AND WAGES.
6–306.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “EDUCATION SUPPORT PROFESSIONAL” MEANS A
NONCERTIFICATED PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEE DESIGNATED AS PART OF A
NONSUPERVISORY BARGAINING UNIT UNDER SUBTITLE 5 OF THIS TITLE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0892*

SENATE BILL 892
(3) “PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
6–501 OF THIS TITLE.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING § 3–413 OF THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT
ARTICLE, EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL PAY TO EACH EDUCATION SUPPORT
PROFESSIONAL THE MINIMUM WAGE FOR EDUCATION SUPPORT PROFESSIONALS
SET UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) (1) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2025, THE MINIMUM WAGE RATE FOR
EDUCATION SUPPORT PROFESSIONALS IS $25.00 PER HOUR.
(2) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ON JULY 1,
2026, AND EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER, THE MINIMUM WAGE RATE FOR EDUCATION
SUPPORT PROFESSIONALS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL INCREASE BY AN AMOUNT THAT EQUALS THE PRODUCT OF MULTIPLYING:
(I) THE MINIMUM WAGE RATE FOR EDUCATION SUPPORT
PROFESSIONALS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION FOR THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR;
AND
(II) THE PERCENTAGE GROWTH IN THE CONSUMER PRICE
INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS OR A SUCCESSOR INDEX PUBLISHED BY THE
U.S. BUREAU OF LABOR STATISTICS.
(3) (I) THE PERCENTAGE GROWTH IN THE CONSUMER PRICE
INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(II) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE DETERMINED BY COMPARING THE AVERAGE OF THE INDEX
FOR THE 12 MONTHS ENDING ON THE JUNE 30 IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE YEAR
FOR WHICH THE MINIMUM WAGE RATE FOR EDUCATION SUPPORT PROFESSIONALS
IS BEING CALCULATED TO THE AVERAGE OF THE INDEX FOR THE PRIOR 12 MONTHS.
(II) IF THERE IS A DECLINE OR NO GROWTH IN THE CONSUMER
PRICE INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS OR IN THE SUCCESSOR INDEX, THE
AMOUNT OF THE MINIMUM WAGE RATE FOR EDUCATION SUPPORT PROFESSIONALS
SHALL REMAIN UNCHANGED.
(D) THE STATE BOARD MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS NECESSARY TO CARRY
OUT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.